Hawaii, session 2026, SB3050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's maritime sector, including shipbuilding and repair, port and harbor operations, marine transportation, and ocean-based industries, is essential to the State's economic resilience, supply chain reliability, and emergency preparedness. The legislature further finds that Hawaii faces persistent workforce shortages in maritime occupations due to an aging workforce, limited training pipelines, and insufficient exposure of young people to viable, high-wage career pathways.  Many young adults lack access to hands-on, paid training opportunities that lead directly to family-sustaining employment, contributing to youth out-migration and the loss of local talent. The legislature recognizes that maritime careers provide strong earning potential, transferable technical skills, and meaningful work closely connected to Hawaii's island geography and ocean-based economy.  Expanding structured apprenticeship and pre-apprenticeship pathways for individuals ages sixteen to twenty-four will create new opportunities for local youth to remain in Hawaii while entering skilled, in-demand professions. The legislature further finds that Honolulu community college, as part of the university of Hawaii community college system, has demonstrated expertise in technical education, workforce training, and apprenticeship-aligned instruction, and is well positioned to lead a comprehensive, statewide study on the development of a maritime youth apprenticeship pathway. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to inform the development of apprenticeship opportunities in maritime occupations by: (1)  Directing the Honolulu community college to conduct a study and develop a plan for a state-sponsored maritime youth apprenticeship program; (2)  Establishing clear accountability and reporting requirements for the study; and (3)  Appropriating moneys to support this work, without prematurely establishing or mandating a permanent program structure. SECTION 2. (a)  Honolulu community college shall conduct a comprehensive study and develop a plan for a state-sponsored maritime youth apprenticeship program serving individuals sixteen to twenty-four years of age. (b)  In conducting the study, Honolulu community college shall partner with: (1)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism; (2)  The department of education; and (3)  The university of Hawaii community college system. Honolulu community college shall also request the participation of maritime industry employers and labor representatives, including shipyards, port and harbor operators, marine transportation companies, and marine service providers. (c)  The study and apprenticeship plan shall include: (1)  A list of curriculum and instructional requirements that align with secondary and postsecondary career and technical education opportunities; (2)  An assessment of how the program will meet state and federal apprenticeship standards and provide industry‑recognized credentials; (3)  An outline of the pathway from high school coursework and pre-apprenticeship into postsecondary training and registered apprenticeships; (4)  An assessment of employer engagement strategies, including paid on-the-job training opportunities, mentorships, and work-based learning models; (5)  Any resource requirements, including faculty and staff, facilities, equipment, and administrative support; (6)  Any funding considerations and potential public‑private partnership models; and (7)  Implementation options, including discussions of pilot phases, scalability, and geographic reach. SECTION 3. Honolulu community college shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including a proposed program structure, estimated costs, implementation options, and any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to conduct a study and develop a plan for a maritime youth apprenticeship program, including faculty and staff needs, research and analysis, stakeholder engagement, curriculum and pathway design, and reporting requirements. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii system for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________